Maryland, session 2026, HB0460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–218.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0460*

HOUSE BILL 460
(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, a local
jurisdiction may not:
(i) adopt zoning laws or other laws or regulations that prohibit the
construction or operation of solar energy generating stations; or
(ii) deny site development plans for solar energy generating stations
that meet the requirements of subsection (f) of this section.
(4) (i) The total combined number of solar energy generating stations
that may be approved for construction in a priority preservation area that was established
before January 1, 2025, shall:
1. be limited in area to [5%] 2% of the total acreage of the
priority preservation area;
2. be located in the project area within the priority
preservation area; and
3. meet all requirements under this section.
(ii) The prohibitions in paragraph (1) of this subsection do not apply
to the remaining [95%] 98% of a priority preservation area once the [5%] 2% limitation
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph has been achieved for the priority preservation
area.
(iii) A county shall report to the Commission when the [5%] 2%
limitation under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph has been achieved for a priority
preservation area.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of the Environment shall study the environmental
impact of the disposal of solar photovoltaic systems at the end of their life cycle.
(b) On or before September 30, 2027, the Maryland Department of the
Environment shall report its findings under subsection (a) of this section to the General
Assembly in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.